Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.080

Examinations.

Applicants for a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery must successfully complete an examination prepared or approved by the board. The examination shall be conducted in the English language, shall determine the applicant's fitness to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, and may be in whole or in part in writing or by practical application on those general subjects and topics of which knowledge is commonly and generally required of applicants who have obtained the doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery conferred by accredited schools of osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board. If an examination does not encompass the subject of osteopathic principles and practice, the applicant shall be required to complete the board-administered examination. The board may prepare and administer or approve preparation and administration of examinations on such subjects as the board deems advisable. The examination papers of any examination administered by the board shall form a part of the applicant's records and shall be retained as determined by the secretary for a period of not less than one year. All applicants for examination or reexamination shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 37; 1991 c 160 s 7; (1991 c 3 s 150 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1979 c 117 s 13; 1919 c 4 s 5; RRS s 10057. Cf. 1909 c 192 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.57.080 and 18.57.090, part.]